New York, session 2025-2026, A9117.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6801 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 10 to read as follows: 3 10. A licensed pharmacist within their lawful scope of practice may 4 prescribe and order immunizations, medicines, drugs or therapeutic 5 devices to the extent permitted by rules and regulations promulgated by 6 the commissioner and the commissioner of health. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect three months after it shall have 8 become a law. Effective immediately, the state education department and 9 the department of health are authorized to promulgate, amend and/or 10 repeal any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 11 section one of this act on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13748-01-5